District of Columbia statutes.
16-1903

Suspected evasion or disobedience of writ; procedure.

On an application for a writ of habeas corpus, if probable cause is shown for believing that the person charged with confining or detaining the person applying therefor, or on whose behalf the application is made:

(1)

is about to remove the person so detained from the place where he is then detained, for the purpose of evading a writ of habeas corpus, or for other purposes; or

(2)

he would evade or not obey a writ of habeas corpus —

the court or judge shall insert in the writ a clause commanding the United States marshal to serve the writ on the person to whom it is directed and cause him immediately to appear before the court or judge, together with the person so confined or detained. Thereupon, the marshal shall immediately carry those persons before the court or judge, and the court or judge shall proceed to inquire into the matter.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1903.
1973 Ed., § 16-1903.